Massachusetts, session 194th, H1783.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 178L of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking in paragraph (a), in lines 26 through 28,
inclusive, the words, “his right to retain counsel to represent him at such hearing and his right to
have counsel appointed for him if he is found to be indigent as determined by the board using the
standards under chapter 211D; provided, however, that such indigent offender may also apply for
and the board may grant payment of fees for an expert witness in any case where the board in its
classification proceeding intends to rely on the testimony or report of an expert witness prepared
specifically for the purposes of the classification proceeding.”, and inserting in place thereof the
words: “and his right to retain counsel to represent him at such hearing.”
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 178L of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking in paragraph (c), in lines 65 through 73, inclusive, the words, “his right to
retain counsel to represent him at such hearing and his right to have counsel appointed for him if
he is found to be indigent as determined by the board using the standards under chapter 211D;
provided, however, that such indigent offender may also apply for and the board may grant
payment of fees for an expert witness in any case where the board in its classification proceeding
intends to rely on the testimony or report of an expert witness prepared specifically for the
purposes of the classification proceeding.”, and inserting in place thereof the words:- “and his
right to retain counsel to represent him at such hearing.”
SECTION 3. Section 178L of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking in subsection (2), in lines 84 through 87, inclusive, the sentence “The board
shall inform offenders requesting a hearing under the provisions of subsection (1) of their right to
have counsel appointed if a sex offender is deemed to be indigent as determined by the board
using the standards under chapter 211D.”
SECTION 4. Section 178M of chapter 6, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking the following, “The court shall, if requested, appoint counsel to
represent the sex offender in the proceedings if such sex offender is deemed indigent in
accordance with section 2 of chapter 211D.”
of 2